Missouri, session 2026, HB2110.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.441, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 162.441, to read as follows:
162.441. 1. If any school district desires to be attached to a community college
district organized under sections 178.770 to 178.890 or to one or more adjacent seven-
director school districts for school purposes, upon the receipt of a petition setting forth such
fact, signed either by voters of the district equal in number to ten percent of those voting in
the last school election at which school board members were elected or by a majority of the
voters of the district, whichever is the lesser, the school board of the district desiring to be so
attached shall submit the question to the voters at a November election.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1 of this section, a seven-director
district may, by a majority vote of its board of education, propose a plan to the voters of the
district at a November election to attach the district to one or more adjacent seven-director
districts and call an election upon the question of such plan.
3. As an alternative to the procedures in subsection 1 or 2 of this section, a
community college district organized under sections 178.770 to 178.890 may, by a majority
vote of its board of trustees, propose a plan to the voters of the school district at a November
election to attach the school district to the community college district, levy the tax rate
applicable to the community college district at the time of the vote of the board of trustees,
and call an election upon the question of such plan. The community college proposing the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2110 2
annexation shall appear at a public meeting of the school district to which the annexation is
being proposed to present the annexation proposal. The school board shall invite the
community college to make this presentation at a regularly scheduled meeting no more than
one hundred twenty days prior and no less than thirty days prior to the election to present the
annexation proposal. The tax rate applicable to the community college district shall not be
levied as to the school district until the proposal by the board of trustees of the community
college district has been approved by a majority vote of the voters of the school district at the
election called for that purpose. The community college district shall be responsible for the
costs associated with the election.
4. A plat of the proposed changes to all affected districts shall be published and
posted with the notice of election.
5. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ school district become a part of and be annexed to the ______
community college district effective the ______ day of ______, ______? If this proposition is
approved, the overall tax levy in the school district will increase by the community college
tax levy of $_____ per $100 of assessed valuation and all residents of the school district will
be eligible for reduced community college tuition at the in-district rate.
6. If a majority of the votes cast in the district proposing annexation favor annexation,
the secretary shall certify the fact, with a copy of the record, to the board of the district and to
the boards of the districts to which annexation is proposed; whereupon the boards of the
seven-director districts to which annexation is proposed shall meet to consider the
advisability of receiving the district or a portion thereof, and if a majority of all the
members of each board favor annexation, the boundary lines of the seven-director school
districts from the effective date shall be changed to include the district, and the board shall
immediately notify the secretary of the district which has been annexed of its action.
7. Upon the effective date of the annexation, all indebtedness, property and money on
hand belonging thereto shall immediately pass to the seven-director school district. If the
district is annexed to more than one district, the provisions of sections 162.031 and 162.041
shall apply.
8. (1) As used in this subsection, "school district" means a school district that is:
(a) Attached to a community college district organized under sections 178.770 to
178.890; and
(b) Located wholly in any county with more than one hundred thousand but
fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than nine thousand but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants.

HB 2110 3
(2) Each school district shall submit to the voters residing with such school
district the question of whether to detach from the community college district to which
such school district is attached.
(3) The question submitted shall be in substantially the following form: "Shall
the ______ (insert school district name) School District detach from the ______ (insert
community college district name) Community College District?".
(4) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the school district shall detach from the community
college district within six years after the date on which the election was held. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the school district shall not detach from the community college
district unless and until the question is resubmitted under this subsection to the
qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
(5) A question submitted under this subsection shall first be submitted on the
general election day held in November 2026, and on the general election day every six
years after, until approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
✔